North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 4B. North Carolina Community Trust Act. [Repealed]

§§ 36A-59.10 through 36A-59.21.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross References.

For current provisions of North Carolina Community Trust Act, see

G.S. 36D-1

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Former G.S. 36A-59.21 was repealed by Session Laws 1991 (Regular Session, 1992), c. 1044, s. 48(a).